Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.065

Claims fund—Reimbursement.

The county legislative authority of any county may establish by resolution a fund to be known as the claims fund, which shall be used for paying claims against the county. Such claims fund shall be reimbursed from any county funds or other funds under the jurisdiction or control of the county treasurer or county auditor budgeted for such expenditures. The deposits shall be made in the exact amount of the vouchers paid from the claims fund.

[ 1991 c 363 s 65; 1973 1st ex.s. c 38 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 214 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.